Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1805
Supplier of turquoise; provide information.

Any person engaged in supplying natural turquoise, unnatural turquoise, or both for use in the manufacture or production of American Indian arts and crafts or for sale to consumers shall provide accurate information concerning the source and quality of the turquoise being supplied.

Laws 1986, LB 275, § 5.